Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB138.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Child" means a biological, adopted, or foster child, stepchild, or legal
ward of an employee if the child is less than eighteen (18) years old, or is
over eighteen (18) years old but incapable of self-care due to a mental or
physical disability;
(b) "Earned paid sick leave" means the time off from work that is provided by
an employer to an employee as computed under this section that can be used
for purposes set forth in this section and is compensated at the same hourly
rate as the employee earns from his or her employment at the time the
employee uses the paid sick leave; however, the hourly rate shall not be less
than the minimum hourly wage under KRS 337.275;
(c) "Employee" has the same meaning as in KRS 337.010(1)(e);
(d) "Employer" has the same meaning as in KRS 337.010(1)(d);
(e) "Health care provider" means any person licensed under federal or state
law to provide health care services, or any other person authorized to
provide health care by a licensed health care professional, including but not
limited to physicians, osteopaths, nurses, advanced practice registered
nurses, physician assistants, and psychologists;
(f) "Parent" means a biological, adoptive, or foster parent of an employee or
an employee's spouse, or other person who assumed the responsibilities of
parenthood when the employee or the employee's spouse was a child; and
(g) "Spouse" means the person to whom an employee is married.
(2) Each employer shall provide earned paid sick leave to each employee working for
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/4/2025 5:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1077
the employer in the state. An employee shall begin accruing earned paid sick
leave beginning on his or her date of hire or on the effective date of this Act,
whichever is later, but employees shall not be entitled to use accrued earned sick
leave until the ninetieth calendar day following commencement of employment.
For every thirty (30) hours worked, the employee shall accrue one (1) hour of
earned paid sick leave. An employee exempt from overtime requirements under
state or federal law shall be assumed to work forty (40) hours each week unless
his or her normal work week is less than forty (40) hours, in which case earned
paid sick leave shall accrue based on that normal work week.
(3) The employer shall not be required to permit the employee to accrue at any one
(1) time, or carry forward from one (1) year to the next, more than forty (40)
hours of earned paid sick leave if the employer has less than ten (10) employees
or more than seventy-two (72) hours of earned paid sick leave if the employer has
ten (10) or more employees.
(4) An employer is considered to be in compliance with this section if the employer
offers any other fully paid leave that may be used for the purposes set forth in this
section in the manner provided for in this section and is accrued at a rate equal to
or greater than the rate described in this section. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to discourage or prohibit any employer from allowing the accrual of
earned paid sick leave at a faster rate, or the use of earned paid sick leave at an
earlier date, than this section requires.
(5) An employer shall permit an employee to use accrued earned paid sick leave
pursuant to this section for any of the following:
(a) Time needed for the diagnosis, care, or medical treatment of, or recovery
from, an employee's mental or physical illness, injury, or other health
condition;
(b) Time needed for the diagnosis, care, or medical treatment of, or recovery
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/4/2025 5:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1077
from, a mental or physical illness, injury, or other health condition of the
employee's child, parent, or spouse; and
(c) Time needed due to circumstances resulting from the employee or the
employee's child, parent, or spouse being a victim of domestic violence, so
long as the leave is to allow the victim to:
1. Obtain medical attention needed to recover from physical or mental
injury or disability caused by the domestic violence;
2. Obtain services from a victim services organization;
3. Relocate due to domestic violence or sexual assault;
4. Obtain a restraining or protective order; or
5. Participate in any civil or criminal proceedings related to the domestic
violence.
(6) If the employee's need to use earned paid sick leave is foreseeable, the employer
may require advance notice, not to exceed seven (7) days prior to the date such
leave is to begin, of the intention to use earned paid sick leave and the expected
duration of the leave. The employee shall make a reasonable effort to schedule
the use of earned paid sick leave in a manner that does not unduly disrupt the
operations of the employer.
(7) If the employee's need to use earned paid sick leave is not foreseeable, an
employer may require an employee to give notice of the intention to use earned
paid sick leave as soon as practicable. For earned paid sick leave of more than
three (3) days, an employer may require reasonable documentation that the leave
is being used for a purpose permitted under this section. If the leave is used
pursuant to subsection (5)(a) or (b) of this section, documentation signed by a
health care provider who is treating the employee or the employee's child, parent,
or spouse indicating the need for the leave and the anticipated necessary number
of days of leave shall be considered reasonable documentation. If the leave is
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/4/2025 5:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1077
used pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this section, a court record, a law
enforcement report, or documentation signed by an attorney, police officer,
counselor, or representative of a victim services organization shall be considered
reasonable documentation.
(8) Unless an employee policy or collective bargaining agreement provides for the
payment of unused accrued earned paid sick leave benefits upon termination, an
employee shall not be entitled to payment of unused accrued earned paid sick
leave benefits upon termination of employment.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require any employer to provide earned
paid sick leave for an employee's leave for any purpose other than those
described in this section.
(10) An employer shall not:
(a) Retaliate against an employee because the employee requests or uses earned
paid sick leave in accordance with this section or the employer's own earned
paid sick leave policy, or files a complaint alleging the employer's violation
of this section; or
(b) Count earned paid sick leave as an absence that may result in disciplinary
action against the employee.
(11) Each employer subject to this section shall, at the time of hiring, provide notice to
each employee of the entitlement to earned paid sick leave, the amount of earned
paid sick leave provided, and the terms under which earned paid sick leave may
be used.
(12) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an employer from:
(a) Taking disciplinary action against an employee who used earned paid sick
leave for purposes other than those described in this section; or
(b) Adopting a policy whereby an employee may donate unused accrued earned
paid sick leave to another employee.
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/4/2025 5:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1077
(13) (a) An employee shall not be required to use earned paid sick leave for any
absence during a period of time in which, by mutual consent of the
employee and the employer, the employee works an equivalent number of
additional hours during the same or the next pay period as the hours not
worked due to reasons permitted in this section.
(b) An employer shall not require an employee to work additional hours to
make up hours in which the employee was absent or require the employee to
find a replacement employee to cover hours during which the employee is
using earned paid sick leave.
Section 2. KRS 337.990 is amended to read as follows:
The following civil penalties shall be imposed by the Education and Labor Cabinet, in
accordance with the provisions in KRS 336.985, for violations of the provisions of this
chapter:
(1) Any firm, individual, partnership, or corporation that violates KRS 337.020 shall be
assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense. Each failure to pay an employee the
wages when due him or her under KRS 337.020 shall constitute a separate
offense;[.]
(2) Any employer who violates KRS 337.050 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000);[.]
(3) Any employer who violates KRS 337.055 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
for each offense and shall make full payment to the employee by reason of the
violation. Each failure to pay an employee the wages as required by KRS 337.055
shall constitute a separate offense;[.]
(4) Any employer who violates KRS 337.060 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/4/2025 5:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1077
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000)
and shall also be liable to the affected employee for the amount withheld, plus
interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum;[.]
(5) Any employer who violates the provisions of KRS 337.065 shall be assessed a civil
penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each offense and shall make full payment to the employee by
reason of the violation;[.]
(6) Any person who fails to comply with KRS 337.070 shall be assessed a civil penalty
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) for each offense and each day that the failure continues shall be deemed a
separate offense;[.]
(7) Any employer who violates any provision of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, KRS
337.345, and KRS 337.385 to 337.405, or willfully hinders or delays the
commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative in the performance
of his or her duties under KRS 337.295, or fails to keep and preserve any records as
required under KRS 337.320 and 337.325, or falsifies any record, or refuses to
make any record or transcription thereof accessible to the commissioner or the
commissioner's authorized representative shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
A civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be assessed for
any subsequent violation of KRS 337.285(4) to (9) and each day the employer
violates KRS 337.285(4) to (9) shall constitute a separate offense and penalty;[.]
(8) Any employer who pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than the rate
applicable under KRS 337.275 and 337.285, or any wage order issued pursuant
thereto shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100)
nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);[.]
(9) Any employer who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/4/2025 5:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1077
employee because the employee has made any complaint to his or her employer, to
the commissioner, or to the commissioner's authorized representative that he or she
has not been paid wages in accordance with KRS 337.275 and 337.285 or
regulations issued thereunder, or because the employee has caused to be instituted
or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or related to KRS
337.385, or because the employee has testified or is about to testify in any such
proceeding, shall be deemed in violation of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, KRS 337.345,
and KRS 337.385 to 337.405 and shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than
one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);[.]
(10) Any employer who violates KRS 337.365 shall be assessed a civil penalty of not
less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars
($1,000);[.]
(11) A person shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars
($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) when that person discharges or
in any other manner discriminates against an employee because the employee has:
(a) Made any complaint to his or her employer, the commissioner, or any other
person; or
(b) Instituted, or caused to be instituted, any proceeding under or related to KRS
337.420 to 337.433; or
(c) Testified, or is about to testify, in any such proceedings; and
(12) Any employer who violates Section 1 of this Act shall be assessed a civil penalty
of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense. Each day of
violation shall constitute a separate offense, and the violation as it affects each
individual employee shall constitute a separate offense. The Attorney General, or
any person authorized to act on his or her behalf, shall initiate enforcement of
this penalty.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/4/2025 5:51 PM Jacketed